Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6502
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Key Employer and Jobs Retention Act is to provide incentives to encourage key employers to remain in the state and retain well-paid employees in the state when there is a change in ownership and control of the key employer and the new owners are considering moving some or all of the key employer's jobs to other states.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 45.